District of Columbia statutes.
38-822.07

Triennial review.

The Healthy Schools and Youth Commission shall review school nutrition and the requirements of this title at least every 3 years and recommend improvements to the Mayor and the Council.

History

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 207, 57 DCR 4779